District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.63

Reduction of paid-in surplus.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 206, ch. 269, § 63
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.63.
1981 Ed., § 29-363.
1973 Ed., § 29-926.